Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1009

Known claims against dissolved limited cooperative association.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, a dissolved limited cooperative association may give notice of a known claim under subsection (2) of this section, which has the effect provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) A dissolved limited cooperative association in a record may notify its known claimants of the dissolution. The notice must:

(a) Specify the information required to be included in a claim;

(b) State that a claim must be in writing and provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent;

(c) State the deadline for receipt of a claim, which may not be less than one hundred twenty days after the date the notice is received by the claimant; and

(d) State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

(3) A claim against a dissolved limited cooperative association is barred if the requirements of subsection (2) of this section are met, and:

(a) The claim is not received by the specified deadline; or

(b) If the claim is timely received but rejected by the association:

(i) The association causes the claimant to receive a notice in a record stating that the claim is rejected and will be barred unless the claimant commences an action against the association to enforce the claim not later than ninety days after the claimant receives the notice; and

(ii) The claimant does not commence the required action not later than ninety days after the claimant receives the notice.

(4) This section does not apply to a claim based on an event occurring after the date of dissolution or a liability that on that date is contingent.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1009.]